Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-126
Regulation of competition.

Except for requirements established by statute, the commission may limit, remove, or waive regulatory requirements for telecommunications companies when it determines that competition will serve the same purposes as public interest regulation. The commission may revoke any waivers it grants or reinstate regulations if such revocation or reinstatement would protect the public interest upon a finding that the telecommunications company is restricting market output, impairing customer interest, or engaging in unlawful anticompetitive activity.

Laws 1986, LB 835, § 7;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 86-807;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 26.